Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.040

Assisting in transactions.

(1) Except in the course of official duties or incident to official duties, no state officer or state employee may assist another person, directly or indirectly, whether or not for compensation, in a transaction involving the state:

(a) In which the state officer or state employee has at any time participated; or

(b) If the transaction involving the state is or has been under the official responsibility of the state officer or state employee within a period of two years preceding such assistance.

(2) No state officer or state employee may share in compensation received by another for assistance that the officer or employee is prohibited from providing under subsection (1) or (3) of this section.

(3) A business entity of which a state officer or state employee is a partner, managing officer, or employee shall not assist another person in a transaction involving the state if the state officer or state employee is prohibited from doing so by subsection (1) of this section.

(4) This chapter does not prevent a state officer or state employee from assisting, in a transaction involving the state:

(a) The state officer's or state employee's parent, spouse or domestic partner, or child, or a child thereof for whom the officer or employee is serving as guardian, executor, administrator, trustee, or other personal fiduciary, if the state officer or state employee did not participate in the transaction; or

(b) Another state employee involved in disciplinary or other personnel administration proceedings.

[ 2008 c 6 s 203; 1994 c 154 s 104.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.